Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201117-208
Appointive officers; term of office; police officer;
removal, demotion, or suspension; procedure; board of health; members; duties.

(1) The village board of trustees
may appoint a village clerk, treasurer, attorney, overseer of the streets,
and marshal or chief of police and
other such officers as shall be required by ordinance or otherwise required
by law.

(2)(a) The village
marshal or chief of police or any other police officer may appeal to the village
board his or her removal, demotion, or suspension with or without pay. After
a hearing, the village board may uphold, reverse, or modify the action.

(b) The village board of trustees shall by ordinance adopt rules and
regulations governing the removal, demotion, or suspension with or without
pay of any police officer, including the village marshal or chief of police.
The ordinance shall include a procedure for such removal, demotion, or suspension
with or without pay of any police officer, including the village marshal or
chief of police, upon the written accusation of the village marshal or chief
of police, the chairperson, or any citizen or taxpayer. The village board
of trustees shall establish by ordinance procedures for acting upon such written
accusation, including: (i) Provisions for giving notice and a copy of the
written accusation to the police officer; (ii) the police officer's right
to have an attorney or representative retained by the police officer present
with him or her at all hearings or proceedings regarding the written accusation;
(iii) the right of the police officer or his or her attorney or representative
retained by the police officer to be heard and present evidence; and (iv)
the right of the police officer as well as the individual imposing the action
or their respective attorneys or representatives to record all hearings or
proceedings regarding the written accusation. The ordinance shall also include
a procedure for making application for an appeal, specifications on the period
of time within which such application shall be made, and provisions on the
manner in which the appeals hearing shall be conducted. Both the police officer
and the individual imposing the action or their respective attorneys or representatives
shall have the right at the hearing to be heard and to present evidence to
the village board for its consideration. Not later than thirty days following
the adjournment of the meeting at which the hearing was held, the village
board shall vote to uphold, reverse, or modify the action. The failure of
the village board to act within thirty days or the failure of a majority of
the elected board members to vote to reverse or modify the action shall be
construed as a vote to uphold the action. The decision of the village board
shall be based upon its determination that, under the facts and evidence presented
at the hearing, the action was necessary for the proper management and the
effective operation of the police department in the performance of its duties
under the statutes of the State of Nebraska. Nothing in this section shall
be construed to prevent the preemptory suspension or immediate removal from
duty of an officer by the appropriate authority, pending the hearing authorized
by this section, in cases of gross misconduct, neglect of duty, or disobedience
of orders.

(c) This subsection does not apply to a police officer during his or
her probationary period.

(3) The village board of trustees
shall also appoint a board of health consisting of three members: The chairperson
of the village board, who shall be chairperson, and two other members. One
member shall be a physician or health care provider, if one can be found who
is willing to serve. Such physician or health care provider, if appointed,
shall be the board's medical advisor. If the village board of trustees has
appointed a marshal or chief of police, the marshal or chief of police may
be appointed to the board and serve as secretary and quarantine officer. A
majority of the board of health shall constitute a quorum and shall enact
rules and regulations, which shall have the force and effect of law, to safeguard
the health of the people of such village and prevent nuisances and unsanitary
conditions. The board of health shall enforce the same and provide fines and
punishments for violations.

(4) The village clerk, treasurer, attorney,
overseer of the streets, members of the board of health, and other appointed
officers, except regular police officers, shall hold office for one year
unless removed by the chairperson of the village board with the advice and
consent of the trustees.

Laws 1879, § 47, p. 204;

Laws 1885, c. 18, § 1, p. 158;

Laws 1895, c. 15, § 1, p. 110;

Laws 1911, c. 20, § 1, p. 137;

R.S.1913, § 5058;

Laws 1919, c. 165, § 1, p. 369;

C.S.1922, § 4230;

C.S.1929, § 17-208;

R.S.1943, § 17-208;

Laws 1995, LB 346, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1162, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB158, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB308, § 2.

Village marshal is appointive officer, and is not an employee within the meaning of the Workmen's Compensation Act. Suverkrubbe v. Village of Fort Calhoun, 127 Neb. 472, 256 N.W. 47 (1934).